Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-271
Hearing; not requested within five days; recommended punishment; effect.

If a hearing is not requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269 by the student or the student's parent or guardian within five school days following receipt of the written notice, the punishment recommended in the charge by the principal or his or her designee shall automatically go into effect upon the fifth school day following receipt of the written notice by the student or his or her parent or guardian as required in section 79-268.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,184;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 75.